Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1175.8, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1175.8. A. If the medical supervisor reports that the
person appears to have achieved competency after a finding of
incompetency, the court shall hold another competency hearing to

Req. No. 13033 Page 1

dete rmine if the person has achieved competency. If competency has
been achieved, the criminal proceedings shall be resumed.
B. If the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services or designee wishes to administer medication, including
psychotropic medication, to a person in custody under the provisions
of subsection A of Section 1175.6a of this title and has reason to
believe the person lacks the capacity to consent to or refuse
medication or the person refuses to take the medication voluntarily,
the Department or designee shall notify the court, the prosecuting
office who filed the criminal petition, and the attorney for the
person. The prosecuting office or the Department or designee may,
on behalf of the state, file an application for an order authorizing
medication for purposes of competency restoration with the court.
Any such application shall also seek authorization to continue
medication for purposes of maintaining the level of restoration in
jail following competency restoration.
C. An application seeking authorization of medication shall
indicate:
1. If the treating physician of the person believes the person
lacks the capacity to make a decision regarding administration of
the medication and the reasons for that belief;
2. A summary of the individualized treatment plan of the
person, including the specific medications to be potentially
administered and the corresponding dosage ranges;
Req. No. 13033 Page 2

3. The diagnosis of the person made by the treating physician;
and
4. The proposed method for administering the medication and, if
the method is not customary, an explanation justifying the departure
from the customary method.
D. The hearing on the application shall be held no later than
thirty (30) days after the filing of the application, unless good
cause is shown.
E. A person for whom an application for an order to authorize
the administration of medication is filed is entitled to:
1. An attorney to represent the person at the hearing. If the
person cannot afford an attorney, the court shall appoint an
attorney;
2. Meet with the attorney as soon as is practicable to prepare
for the hearing;
3. Receive, as soon as practicable after the time the hearing
is set, a copy of the application and written notice of the time,
place, and date of the hearing;
4. Notice of the right to a hearing and right to the assistance
of an attorney to prepare for the hearing;
5. Be present at the hearing;
6. Request from the court an independent expert; and
7. Notification at the conclusion of the hearing of the
determination made by the court.
Req. No. 13033 Page 3

F. The administration of medication shall not be ordered unless
the petitioning party proves by clear and convincing evidence that:
1. There exists an important state interest that justifies
overriding the lack of consent by the person to the administration
of medication;
2. Involuntary medication is substantially likely to render the
person competent to stand trial and substantially unlikely to have
side effects that will interfere significantly with the ability of
the person to assist trial counsel;
3. Involuntary medication is necessary to further the interests
of the state and any alternative, less intrusive treatments are not
likely to achieve substantially the same results; and
4. The administration of the medication is in the best medical
interest of the person in light of the medical condition of the
person.
G. The court shall make specific findings of fact concerning:
1. Each consideration listed under the provisions of subsection
F of this section;
2. The desires of the person regarding the proposed treatment;
and
3. The capacity of the person to consent to or refuse
medication.
H. An order for the administration of medications entered
following a hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be
Req. No. 13033 Page 4

effe ctive for the period of the current involuntary commitment
order, and any interim period during which the person is awaiting
trial or a hearing on a new petition for involuntary treatment or
involuntary medication. The order shall specify all medications to
be potentially involuntarily administered and corresponding dosage
ranges.
I. Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate,
prohibit, or alter the administration of medication to a person
under other laws or regulations of this state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-13033 GRS 02/27/25












Req. No. 13033 Page 5